src/pronoun-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Pronouns
! ========


!Pointing to all the pronominal subgrops
LEXICON Pronoun
 Personal ;
 Demonstrative ;
 Reflexive ;
 Reciprocal ;
 Interrogative ;
 Relative ;
 Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m persproncasesg ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Du1:m persproncasedu ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m persproncasepl ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d persproncasesgII ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Du2:d persproncasedu ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d persproncasepl ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3:s persproncasesgII ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Du3:s persproncasedu ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3:s persproncasepl ;
dat+Pron+Pers:da%> datcas ;
dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:da%>tga # ;
dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen:da%>ŋga # ;
 dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:da%>ŋgas # ; !
 dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:da%>ŋga NAMÁK ; !
dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Elat:da%>jste # ;

LEXICON persproncasesg
 +Nom:å%>n K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:å%>nnå K ; !
 +Gen:u%>v K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:u%>v NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+Use/NG:u%>vva K ; !
 +Abe:u%>v#tá K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#da K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#tagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>#da K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:u%>v K ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:u%>vva K ; !
 +Ill:u%>nji K ;
 +Ine:u%>jna K ;
 +Ine+Use/NG:u%>ne K ; !
 +Ine+Use/NG:u%>jne K ; !
 +Ela:u%>jsta K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:u%>jste K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:u%>sta K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:u%>ste K ; !
 +Par:u%>nnut K ;
 +Com:u%>jna K ;
 +Com+Use/NG:u%>jne K ; !
 
LEXICON persproncasesgII
 +Nom:å%>n K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:å%>dnå K ; !
 +Gen:u%>v K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:u%>v NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+Use/NG:u%>vva K ; !
 +Abe:u%>v#tá K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#da K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>v#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:u%>v K ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:u%>vva K ; !
 +Ill:u%>nji K ;
 +Ine:u%>jna K ;
 +Ine+Use/NG:u%>ne K ; !
 +Ela:u%>jsta K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:u%>jste K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:u%>ste K ; !
 +Par:u%>nnut K ;
 +Com:u%>jna K ;
 +Abe:u%>vda K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:u%>vdaga K ; !

LEXICON persproncasedu
 +Nom:åj%> K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:ådja%> K ; !
 +Gen:unnu%> K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:unnu%> NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:unnu%>#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:unnu%>#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:unnu%>#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:unnu%>#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:unnu%>#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:unnu%>v K ;
 +Ill:unnu%>j K ;
 +Ill+Use/NG:unnu%>jna K ; !
 +Ine:unnu%>n K ;
 +Ela:unnu%>s K ;
 +Com:unnu%>jn K ;

LEXICON persproncasepl
! The second entry of each oblique case is a less common form
 +Nom:ij%> K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:idja%> K ; !
 +Gen:ijá%> K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:ijá%> NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen:ijá%>j K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:ijá%>j NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:ijá%>#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#da K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#tagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:ijá%>j#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:ijá%>v K ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:ijá%>jt K ; !
 +Ill:idji%>j K ;
 +Ill+Use/NG:idji%>jda K ; !
 +Ill+Use/NG:ijá%>jda K ; !
 +Ine:ijá%>n K ;
 +Ine+Use/NG:ijá%>jn K ; !
 +Ela:ijá%>s K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:ijá%>js K ; !
 +Com:ijá%>jn K ;
 +Com+Use/NG:ijá%>j K ; !
 +Abe:ijá%>da K ;

LEXICON datcas
 +Sg3:0 datcassg ;
 +Pl3:0 datcaspl ;

! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON demcas
 +Sg:0 demcassg ;
 +Pl:0 demcaspl ;

LEXICON demcassg 
 +Nom:t K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:hta K ; !
 +Gen:n K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:n NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:n#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:v K ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:vva K ; !
 +Ill:si K ;
 +Ine:n0na K ; ! was: n'n
 +Ine+Use/NG:nne K ; !
 +Ela:ssta K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:sste K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:sstága K ; !
 +Com:jna K ;
 +Ess:nen K ;
 +Par:t K ;
 +Ine+Attr:n K ;
 +Ill+Attr:n K ;
 +Abe:bdá K ;

LEXICON demcaspl
 +Nom: K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:ha K ; !
 :j demcasplobl ;

LEXICON demcasplobl
 +Gen: K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:t K ;
 +Ill:da K ;
 +Ine:n K ;
 +Ela:s K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:sta K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:stága # ; !
 +Com: K ;

LEXICON datcassg 
 +Nom:t K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:hta K ; !
 +Gen:n K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:n NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:n#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:n#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:v K ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:vva K ; !
 +Ill:si K ;
 +Ine:n0na K ; ! was: n'n
 +Ine+Use/NG:nne K ; !
 +Ela:ssta K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:sste K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:sstága K ; !
 +Com:jna K ;
 +Ess:nen K ;
 +Par:t K ;
 +Abe:bdá K ;

LEXICON datcaspl
 +Nom: K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:ha K ; !
 :j datcasplobl ;

LEXICON datcasplobl
 +Gen: K ;
 +Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; !
 +Abe:#da K ;
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; !
 +Acc:t K ;
 +Ill:da K ;
 +Ine:n K ;
 +Ela:s K ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:sta K ; !
 +Ela+Use/NG:stága # ; !
 +Com: K ;

LEXICON dátcas
 +Nom:hta K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:htak # ; !
 +Gen:ŋga # ;
 +Gen+Use/NG:ŋga NAMÁK ; !
 +Acc:vga # ;
 +Ill:siga # ;
 +Ine:nnága # ;
 +Ela:stága # ;
 +Ela+Use/NG:stága # ; !
 +Com:jnak # ;
 
LEXICON dakkárcase
 +Attr: K ;
 +Attr+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; !
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Abe:a#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dak K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagi K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagá K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#tagá K ; !
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ij NAMÁK ; !
 +Pl+Abe:ij#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dak K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagi K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagá K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#tagá K ; !
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;

LEXICON duobbacase
! +Attr:bba%> K ;
 +Sg+Nom:bba%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ppa%> K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:ppa%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:ppa%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%> NAMÁK ; !
 +Sg+Abe:ppa%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dak K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagi K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagá K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#tagá K ; !
 +Sg+Acc:ppa%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:bba%>j K ;
 +Sg+Ine:ppa%>n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:ppa%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:ppa%>jn K ;
 +Ess:bba%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ppa%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ppa%>j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%>j NAMÁK ; !
 +Pl+Abe:ppa%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dak K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagi K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#tagá K ; !
 +Pl+Acc:ppa%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ppa%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ppa%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ppa%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:ppa%>j K ;




! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
!Two nominative reflexives, and pointer to the rest
iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:iesj%> K ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom:ietja%> K ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:ietja%> K ;
 iesj+Pron+Refl+Ess+Use/Sub:iehtja%>n K ; !
iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg:0 refloblsg ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl:0 refloblpl ;


iesj+Pron+Refl: reflobl;

LEXICON Demonstrative
dat+Pron+Dem:da%> demcas ;
dát+Pron+Dem:dá%> demcas ;
dát+Pron+Dem+Sg:dá%> dátcas ;
duot+Pron+Dem:duo%> demcas ;
dåt+Pron+Dem:då%> demcas ;
dakkár+Pron+Dem:dakkár%> dakkárcase ;
dahkkár+Pron+Dem:dahkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dahkár+Pron+Dem:dahkár%> dakkárcase ;
dakkir+Pron+Dem:dakkir%> dakkárcase ;
dahkkir+Pron+Dem:dahkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dahkir+Pron+Dem:dahkir%> dakkárcase ;
dákkár+Pron+Dem:dákkár%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkkár+Pron+Dem:dáhkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkár+Pron+Dem:dáhkár%> dakkárcase ;
dákkir+Pron+Dem:dákkir%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkkir+Pron+Dem:dáhkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkir+Pron+Dem:dáhkir%> dakkárcase ;
duokkár+Pron+Dem:duokkár%> dakkárcase ;
duohkkár+Pron+Dem:duohkkár%> dakkárcase ;
duohkár+Pron+Dem:duohkár%> dakkárcase ;
duokkir+Pron+Dem:duokkir%> dakkárcase ;
duohkkir+Pron+Dem:duohkkir%> dakkárcase ;
duohkir+Pron+Dem:duohkir%> dakkárcase ;
diekkár+Pron+Dem:diekkár%> dakkárcase ;
diehkkár+Pron+Dem:diehkkár%> dakkárcase ;
diehkár+Pron+Dem:diehkár%> dakkárcase ;
diekkir+Pron+Dem:diekkir%> dakkárcase ;
diehkkir+Pron+Dem:diehkkir%> dakkárcase ;
diehkir+Pron+Dem:diehkir%> dakkárcase ;
dåkkár+Pron+Dem:dåkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkkár+Pron+Dem:dåhkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkár+Pron+Dem:dåhkár%> dakkárcase ;
dåkkir+Pron+Dem:dåkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkkir+Pron+Dem:dåhkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkir+Pron+Dem:dåhkir%> dakkárcase ;
LEXICON Indefinite
 vajku% makkár+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vajku% makkár%> dakkárcase ; ! speller diehti
 vajku% makkir+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vajku% makkir%> dakkárcase ; ! speller diehti
 vájk% makkár+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vájk% makkár%> dakkárcase ; ! speller diehti
 vájk% makkir+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vájk% makkir%> dakkárcase ; ! speller diehti
duobba+Pron+Indef:duo duobbacase ;
dábba+Pron+Indef:dá duobbacase ;
